src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_KIVETÄ

:pene  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:pene  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:pene  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
:pene  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:pen  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
:pen  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
:pen  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;

:ven  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;

:vet  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
:vet  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
:vet  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
:vet  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
:vet  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
:vet  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC  ;

:ve  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;

LEXICON VERB_LEPÄILLÄ

:ile  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:ile  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:ile  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
:ile  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:ill  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
:ill  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
:ill  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;

:il  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
:il  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
:il  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
:il  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
:il  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L  ;
:il  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_L  ;
:il  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
:il  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_L  ;

:ele  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:ele  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:ele  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
:ele  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:ell  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
:ell  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
:ell  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;

:el  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
:el  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
:el  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
:el  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
:el  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L  ;
:el  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_L  ;
:el  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
:el  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_L  ;

LEXICON VERB_RENNOTA

:non  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;

:not  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:not  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:not  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:not  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:not  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
:not  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC  ;

:no  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;

:tone  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:tone  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:tone  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
:tone  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:ton  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:ton  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
:ton  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;

LEXICON VERB_ROHJETA

:jen  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;

:jet  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:jet  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:jet  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:jet  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:jet  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
:jet  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC  ;

:je  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;

:kene  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:kene  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:kene  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
:kene  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:ken  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:ken  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
:ken  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;

LEXICON VERB_SYÖPYÄ

:py  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
:py  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;

:vyt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
:vyt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

:vy  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:vy  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
:vy  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;

LEXICON VERB_TUIKKAA

:ka  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:ka  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:ka  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
:ka  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
:ka  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TULLA

:le  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:le  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:le  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
:le  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:ll  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:ll  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:ll  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC  ;

:l  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_L  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_L  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:l  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_L  ;

+Dial:u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;

LEXICON VERB_VAAHDOTA

:don  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;

:dot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:dot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:dot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:dot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:dot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
:dot  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC  ;

:do  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;

:toa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:toa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:toa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
:toa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
:toa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:tos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:tos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;

:to  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;

LEXICON VERB_VERRATA

:ran  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;

:rat  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
:rat  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
:rat  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
:rat  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
:rat  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
:rat  VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC  ;

:ra  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;

:taa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
:taa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
:taa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

:tas  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
:tas  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;

:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;



LEXICON VERB_HALUTA

:a	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT ;

:a	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT ;

:a	VERB_BACK_3SG_A ;

:a	VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;

:a	VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

:n	VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;

:s	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST ;

:s	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;

:t	VERB_BACK_AINF ;

:t	VERB_BACK_EINF ;

:t	VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;

:t	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE ;

:t	VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0 ;

:t	VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_K_ARCHAIC ;

+Dial/Finland:u	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT ;

+Dial/Finland:u	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT ;

+Dial/Finland:u	VERB_BACK_3SG_U ;

+Dial/Finland:u	VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;

+Dial/Finland:u	VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

:	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T ;


LEXICON AUX_AIKOA

:ko	VERB_BACK_AINF ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_EINF ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_3SG_O ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;

:ko	VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

:ko’	VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC ;

:ot	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE ;

:ot	VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0 ;

:o	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT ;

:o	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST ;

:o	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T ;


LEXICON AUX_JOUTUA

:dut	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE ;

:dut	VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0 ;

:du	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT ;

:du	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST ;

:du	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_AINF ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_EINF ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_3SG_U ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

:tu	VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC ;


LEXICON AUX_MAHTAA

:da	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT ;

:det	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE ;

:det	VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0 ;

:de	VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T ;

:do	VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_AINF ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_EINF ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_3SG_A ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

:ta	VERB_BACK_OPTATIVE_0_ARCHAIC ;

:to	VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
