src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
elpyä+V:el  VERB_SYÖPYÄ  ;
epäillä+V:epä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
haluta+V:halu  VERB_HALUTA  ;
henkäillä+V:henkä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
heräillä+V:herä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
hyräillä+V:hyrä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
hyväillä+V:hyvä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
hyökkäillä+V:hyökkä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
häikäillä+V:häikä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
häipyä+V:häi  VERB_SYÖPYÄ  ;
härnäillä+V:härnä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
hätäillä+V:hätä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
hääräillä+V:häärä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
hölmöillä+V:hölmö  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
hörppäillä+V:hörppä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
juljeta+V:jul  VERB_ROHJETA  ;
kadota+V:ka  VERB_VAAHDOTA  ;
karjeta+V:kar  VERB_ROHJETA  ;
kerrata+V:ker  VERB_VERRATA  ;
keräillä+V:kerä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
kivetä+V:ki  VERB_KIVETÄ  ;
kyhäillä+V:kyhä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
kyläillä+V:kylä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
kynäillä+V:kynä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
kyräillä+V:kyrä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
kyttäillä+V:kyttä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
käppäillä+V:käppä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
köyhäillä+V:köyhä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
lepäillä+V:lepä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
lisäillä+V:lisä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
löhöillä+V:löhö  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
löysäillä+V:löysä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
moottoripyöräillä+V:moottoripyörä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
myhäillä+V:myhä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
myötäillä+V:myötä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
mässäillä+V:mässä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
määräillä+V:määrä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
nyhjäillä+V:nyhjä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
nyökkäillä+V:nyökkä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
näppäillä+V:näppä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
näpräillä+V:näprä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
padota+V:pa  VERB_VAAHDOTA  ;
polkupyöräillä+V:polkupyörä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
pröystäillä+V:pröystä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
pudota+V:pu  VERB_VAAHDOTA  ;
pyöräillä+V:pyörä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
pähkäillä+V:pähkä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
pärjäillä+V:pärjä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
pörräillä+V:pörrä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
rennota+V:ren  VERB_RENNOTA  ;
rohjeta+V:roh  VERB_ROHJETA  ;
ryntäillä+V:ryntä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
röyhtäillä+V:röyhtä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
silmäillä+V:silmä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
sykkäillä+V:sykkä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
syöpyä+V:syö  VERB_SYÖPYÄ  ;
säntäillä+V:säntä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
säröillä+V:särö  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
söpöillä+V:söpö  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
tarjeta+V:tar  VERB_ROHJETA  ;
toimeentulla+V:toimeentu  VERB_TULLA  ;
tuikkaa+V:tuik  VERB_TUIKKAA  ;
tulla+V:tu  VERB_TULLA  ;
tähtäillä+V:tähtä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
töppäillä+V:töppä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
töppöillä+V:töppö  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
törmäillä+V:törmä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
törppöillä+V:törppö  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
törttöillä+V:törttö  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
töytäillä+V:töytä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
urjeta+V:ur  VERB_ROHJETA  ;
vaahdota+V:vaah  VERB_VAAHDOTA  ;
valjeta+V:val  VERB_ROHJETA  ;
vedota+V:ve  VERB_VAAHDOTA  ;
verrata+V:ver  VERB_VERRATA  ;
viipyä+V:vii  VERB_SYÖPYÄ  ;
virrata+V:vir  VERB_VERRATA  ;
yökkäillä+V:yökkä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
yöpyä+V:yö  VERB_SYÖPYÄ  ;
äkäillä+V:äkä  VERB_LEPÄILLÄ  ;
